Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1025.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 559.1 of Title 57, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund


for the Oklahoma Department of Corrections to be designated the


"Oklahoma Department of Corrections Prison Rodeo Revolving Fund".


The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year


limitations, and shall consist of all monies directed for deposit by


law. All monies accruing to the credit of said fund are hereby


appropriated and may be used for the purpose of restoring,


rehabilitating, and expanding the prison rodeo arena of the Oklahoma

Req. No. 10204 Page 1


Department of Corrections. Expenditures from said fund shall be


made upon warrants issued by the Oklahoma Department of Corrections


and approved by the Office of Management and Enterprise Services.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-10204 GRS 12/16/24





































Req. No. 10204 Page 2